Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21. Maintenance of Public Schools
§ 835.
Lemington, Bloomfield, Brunswick, Granby, Guildhall, and Maidstone; tuitioning of elementary students.

The Lemington, Bloomfield, Brunswick, Granby, Guildhall, and Maidstone school districts may provide for the elementary education of the students residing in their districts by paying tuition to public elementary schools in the State of New Hampshire. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 823 of this title, school districts affected by this section shall pay the full tuition charged by a public elementary school in New Hampshire.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 72

; amended

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.029.

§ 836.
Tuition overcharge or undercharge.

Annually, on or before November 1, the Secretary shall inform each school board of a receiving public school, each board of trustees of a receiving approved independent school for which the Secretary has calculated a net cost per pupil, and each sending school district in Vermont of the calculated net cost per elementary or secondary pupil in the receiving schools. Each school board or board of trustees of a receiving school shall then determine whether it overcharged or undercharged any sending district for tuition charges and shall notify the district by December 15 of the same year of the amount due or the amount to be refunded or credited.

If the sending district has paid tuition charges in excess of three percent of the calculated net cost per elementary or secondary pupil and is not sending enough students to the receiving district to use the overcharge funds as credit against tuition, the receiving district shall refund the overcharge money by July 31; provided, however, that the refund shall be in the amount that exceeded a three-percent overcharge. Interest owed the sending district on overcharge monies shall begin to accrue on December 1, at the rate of one-half percent per month.

If the receiving district has undercharged tuition in an amount three percent or more than the calculated net cost per elementary or secondary pupil, the sending district shall pay the receiving district an amount equal to the amount of the undercharge that is between three percent and ten percent of the net cost per pupil. If payment is not made by July 31 of the year following the year in which the undercharge was determined, interest owed the receiving district on undercharge monies shall begin to accrue on August 1, at the rate of one percent per month.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 34

, § 4; amended

1995, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2005, No. 54

, § 10;

2013, No. 60

, § 3;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 102, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 837.
School facilities management; training and certification.

The Secretary of Education, in consultation with facilities management industry and school operations experts, shall establish guidelines for the training and certification of each person designated as responsible for facilities management for a school district or supervisory union.

The superintendent for each school district or supervisory union shall designate a person with responsibility for facilities management for the school district or supervisory union. The designee for each school district or supervisory union shall receive training and certification pursuant to the guidelines established in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 72

, § 5, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 838.
Capital improvement plan.

Each school district shall develop and maintain a five-year capital operations and improvement plan for the school district and supervisory union, which shall be updated annually.

The capital operations and improvement plan described in subsection (a) of this section shall be in a form developed and prescribed by the Secretary of Education after consultation with facilities management and school operations experts.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 72

, § 6, eff. June 8, 2021.